Massachusetts, session 194th, H4607.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 94C of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 19D1/2 the following section:-
Section 19E. (a) For the purposes of this section, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, “epinephrine delivery system” shall mean an epinephrine autoinjector or any other
device that is approved by the federal food and drug administration, that contains a premeasured
dose of epinephrine, and that is used to administer epinephrine into the human body to prevent or
treat a life-threatening allergic reaction.
(b) The department shall ensure that a statewide standing order is issued to authorize the
dispensing of an epinephrine delivery system in the commonwealth by any licensed pharmacist.
The statewide standing order shall include, but not be limited to, written, standardized
procedures or protocols for the dispensing of an epinephrine delivery system by a licensed
pharmacist. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner, or
physician designated by the commissioner who is registered to distribute or dispense a controlled
of 8

substance in the course of professional practice pursuant to section 7, shall issue a statewide
standing order that may be used by a licensed pharmacist to dispense an epinephrine delivery
system under this section.
(c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a licensed pharmacist may
dispense an epinephrine delivery system in accordance with the statewide standing order issued
under subsection (b). Except for an act of gross negligence or willful misconduct, a pharmacist
who, acting in good faith, dispenses an epinephrine delivery system shall not be subject to any
criminal or civil liability or any professional disciplinary action by the board of registration in
pharmacy related to the use or administration of an epinephrine delivery system.
(d) Before dispensing an epinephrine delivery system authorized under this section, a
pharmacist may complete an anaphylaxis training program approved by the commissioner;
provided however, that the training shall include, but not be limited to, techniques on how to
recognize symptoms of severe allergic reactions, including anaphylaxis, and emergency follow-
up procedures.
(e) A pharmacist who dispenses an epinephrine delivery system under this section shall
annually provide to the department the number of times such epinephrine delivery systems are
dispensed. Reports made pursuant to this section shall not identify any individual patient, shall
be confidential and shall not be public records as defined by clause Twenty-sixth of section 7 of
chapter 4 or section 10 of chapter 66. The department shall publish an annual report that includes
aggregate information about the dispensing of epinephrine delivery systems in the
commonwealth.
of 8

(f) Except for an act of gross negligence or willful misconduct, the commissioner or a
physician who issues the statewide standing order under subsection (b) and any medical
practitioner who, acting in good faith, directly or through the standing order, prescribes or
dispenses an epinephrine delivery system shall not be subject to any criminal or civil liability or
any professional disciplinary action.
(g) The department, board of registration in medicine, board of registration in nursing and
board of registration in pharmacy shall adopt regulations to implement this section.
SECTION 2. Chapter 94C of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting, after
section 34A1/2, the following section:-
Section 34B. (a) As used in this section, the following word shall have the following
meaning unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
"Epinephrine delivery system”, a device that is approved by the federal food and drug
administration, that contains a premeasured dose of epinephrine, and that is used to administer
epinephrine into the human body to prevent or treat a life-threatening allergic reaction.
“First responder”, a law enforcement officer, a paid, call, reserve or volunteer firefighter,
a paid, call, reserve or volunteer emergency medical technician or any other person whose usual
and regular duties include rendering assistance at the scene of a crime, accident or other
emergency.
(b) A first responder, who, in good faith, seeks medical assistance for someone
experiencing an anaphylactic reaction shall not be charged or prosecuted for possession of a
of 8

controlled substance under sections 34 or 35 if the evidence for the charge of possession of a
controlled substance was gained as a result of the seeking of medical assistance.
(b) A person who experiences an anaphylactic reaction and is in need of medical
assistance and, in good faith, seeks such medical assistance, or is the subject of such a good faith
request for medical assistance, shall not be charged or prosecuted for possession of a controlled
substance under said sections 34 or 35 if the evidence for the charge of possession of a controlled
substance was gained as a result of the anaphylactic reaction and the need for medical assistance.
(c) The act of seeking medical assistance for someone who is experiencing an
anaphylactic reaction may be used as a mitigating factor in a criminal prosecution under the
Controlled Substance Act,1970 P.L. 91–513, 21 U.S.C. section 801, et seq.
(d) Nothing contained in this section shall prevent anyone from being charged with
trafficking, distribution or possession of a controlled substance with intent to distribute.
(e) A first responder acting in good faith may receive an epinephrine delivery system,
possess an epinephrine delivery system and administer an epinephrine delivery system to an
individual appearing to experience an anaphylactic reaction, and provided further that no first
responder shall be liable in a civil suit for damages as a result of any acts or omissions in
providing or obtaining, or attempting to provide or obtain, such assistance unless such acts or
omissions constitute willful, wanton or reckless conduct.
SECTION 3. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4O the following section:-
of 8

Section 4P. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
"Authorized entity", any entity or organization at which allergens capable of causing
anaphylaxis may be present, including, but not limited to, restaurants, recreation camps, youth
sports leagues, amusement parks, colleges, universities, and sports arenas.
"Epinephrine delivery system”, a device that is approved by the federal food and drug
administration, that contains a premeasured dose of epinephrine, and that is used to administer
epinephrine into the human body to prevent or treat a life-threatening allergic reaction.
(b) An authorized entity may acquire and maintain a supply of epinephrine delivery
systems from a wholesaler approved by the department pursuant to this section. All acquired
epinephrine delivery systems shall be stored in a location readily accessible in an emergency and
in accordance with the epinephrine delivery system’s instructions for use. An authorized entity
shall designate employees or agents who have successfully completed the training required by
subsection (e) of this section to be responsible for the storage, maintenance and general oversight
of epinephrine delivery systems acquired under this section.
(c) An authorized entity that chooses to acquire and maintain a supply of epinephrine
delivery systems shall maintain an operations plan on the premises. Such plan shall include, but
not be limited to:
how the training required by subsection (e) will be provided to employees or agents of an
authorized entity;
where and how epinephrine delivery systems will be stored;
of 8

names of the employees or agents who have successfully completed the training required
by subsection (e); and,
how and when epinephrine delivery systems will be inspected to ensure that they have
not expired.
100 (d) An employee or agent of an authorized entity who has completed the training required
101 by subsection (e) of this section may, on the premises of or in connection with the authorized
102 entity, use epinephrine delivery systems obtained under this section to provide or administer an
103 epinephrine delivery system to any individual who the employee or agent believes in good faith
104 is experiencing anaphylaxis for immediate self-administration, regardless of whether the
105 individual has a prescription for an epinephrine delivery system or has previously been
106 diagnosed with an allergy.
107 (e) An employee, agent, or other individual described in subsection (c) of this section
108 must successfully complete an anaphylaxis training program prior to providing or administering
109 an epinephrine delivery system made available by an authorized entity. The training must be
110 conducted by a nationally recognized organization experienced in training laypersons in
111 emergency health treatment or by an entity or individual approved by the department of public
112 health. Training may be conducted online, and at a minimum, shall cover:
113 (i) techniques on how to recognize symptoms of severe allergic reactions, including
114 anaphylaxis;
115 (ii) recommended dosages for adults and children;
of 8

116 (iii) standards and procedures for the storage and administration of epinephrine delivery
117 systems; and
118 (iv) emergency follow-up procedures.
119 (f) Training certification shall be valid for no more than two years, after which
120 recertification with nationally recognized organization experienced in training laypersons in
121 emergency health treatment or by an entity or individual approved by the department of public
122 health is required.
123 (g) The entity shall submit proof of training to the department and receive approval for
124 the acquisition of epinephrine delivery systems.
125 (h) An authorized entity that possesses and makes available epinephrine delivery systems
126 and its trained employees and agents shall not liable for any injuries or related damages that
127 result from the administration or self-administration of an epinephrine delivery system, the
128 failure to administer an epinephrine delivery system, or any other act or omission taken pursuant
129 to this section, provided that said immunity does not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross
130 negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
131 (i) An authorized entity that possesses and makes available epinephrine delivery systems
132 shall submit to the department of public health, on a form developed by the department, a report
133 of each incident on the authorized entity's premises that involves the distribution or
134 administration of the authorized entity's epinephrine delivery systems. The department of public
135 health shall annually publish a report that summarizes and analyzes all reports submitted to it
136 under this subsection.
of 8

137 (j) The department shall promulgate guidance or regulations to carry out this section.
of 8